Utah statutes.
35A-3-608.   Schedule of payments to be paid upon liability -- Establishment -- Cancellation.

(1)  At any time, the department may:

(a)  consistent with the income, earning capacity, and resources of the obligor, set or reset the level and schedule of payments to be paid upon the liability; and

(b)  at any time, cancel the schedule of payments and demand immediate payment in full.

(2)  The department may recover an overpayment through deductions from cash assistance or food stamps pursuant to Section 35A-3-603.

